Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.193

Cities and towns—Ordinance adopting certain sections of chapter—Jurisdiction of courts.

District courts operating under the provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, except municipal departments of such courts operating under chapter 3.46 RCW and municipal courts operating under chapter 3.50 RCW, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court to hear, try, and determine misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor violations of this chapter and violations of any ordinance passed under authority of this chapter by any city or town.

Municipal courts operating under chapters 35.20 or 3.50 RCW and municipal departments of the district court operating under chapter 3.46 RCW, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court to hear, try, and determine violations of any ordinance passed under authority of this chapter by the city or town in which the court is located.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each of these courts shall have the jurisdiction and power to impose up to the maximum penalties provided for the violation of the ordinances adopted under the authority of this chapter. Review of the judgments of these courts shall be as provided in other criminal actions.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 12.]